District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.02

License required.

(a)

A person which is required under law to obtain a license issued in the form of an endorsement to engage in a business in the District of Columbia shall not engage in such business in the District of Columbia without having first obtained a basic business license and any necessary endorsements in accordance with this subchapter.

(b)

A license shall be required for each business location.

(c)

A person issued a license under this subchapter shall not willfully allow any other person required to obtain a separate license to operate under his or her license.

(d)

Licenses granted under this subchapter may be assigned or transferred upon approval by the Department and payment of the applicable fee.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), (d), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38,§ 2(d), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.2.
D.C. Law 15-38 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).